Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2994YC (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 99D.9E Horse racing purse fund. 1 1. A horse racing purse fund is created in the state 2 treasury under the control of the commission. 3 2. The fund shall consist of all of the moneys transferred 4 to the fund pursuant to section 423.2A. 5 3. Beginning April 1, 2026, and each April 1 thereafter, 6 moneys in the fund shall be appropriated to the commission for 7 deposit into the fund for the purpose of supplementing the 8 purse moneys in proportion to the designated purse structure 9 under section 99D.7, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ . The moneys 10 in the fund shall be transferred to the horse racing purse 11 supplement escrow account established in section 99D.9F by 12 April 15 each year. 13 4. Section 8.33 does not apply to moneys in the fund. 14 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 15 earnings on moneys deposited in the fund shall be credited to 16 the fund. 17 5. The commission shall assist the department of revenue to 18 identify retailers involved in the sale of tangible personal 19 property used in horse-related care products in this state that 20 may be subject to the provision of section 423.2A, subsection 21 2, paragraph âhâ . 22 6. The commission shall adopt rules to administer this 23 section. 24 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 99D.9F Horse racing purse supplement 25 escrow account. 26 1. A licensee that receives purse supplement payments shall 27 establish an escrow account under its control for the receipt 28 and deposit of moneys transferred to the licensee for the 29 purpose of horse racing purse supplements. 30 2. The licensee shall use any moneys in the escrow account 31 to supplement the purse moneys in proportion to the designated 32 purse structure in section 99D.7, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ . 33 Sec. 3. Section 423.2A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 34 by adding the following new paragraph: 35 -1- LSB 2994YC (3) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. _____ NEW PARAGRAPH . h. Beginning the first day of the quarter 1 following July 1, 2025, transfer to the horse racing purse 2 fund created in section 99D.9E, that portion of the sales tax 3 receipts collected and remitted upon sales of tangible personal 4 property imposed upon the purchasers of feed, supplements, 5 bedding, tack, grooming, and other materials directly and 6 materially used in the care of race horses. 7